Maryland, session 2025, HB1296.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
1–601.
(a) Permits issued by the Department under the following sections shall be issued
in accordance with this subtitle:
(1) Air quality control permits to construct subject to § 2–404 of this article;
– 1 –

Ch. 474 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) Permits to install, materially alter, or materially extend landfill
systems, incinerators for public use, or rubble landfills subject to § 9–209 of this article;
(3) Permits to discharge pollutants to waters of the State issued pursuant
to § 9–323 of this article;
(4) Permits to install, materially alter, or materially extend a structure
used for storage or distribution of any type of sewage sludge issued, renewed, or amended
pursuant to § 9–234.1 or § 9–238 of this article;
(5) Permits to own, operate, establish, or maintain a controlled hazardous
substance facility issued pursuant to § 7–232 of this article;
(6) Permits to own, operate, or maintain a hazardous material facility
issued pursuant to § 7–103 of this article;
(7) Permits to own, operate, establish, or maintain a low–level nuclear
waste facility issued pursuant to § 7–233 of this article; [and]
(8) Potable reuse permits issued in accordance with § 9–303.2 of this
article; AND
(9) MANAGED AQUIFER RECHARGE PILOT PERMITS ISSUED IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 9–303.4 OF THIS ARTICLE.
7–201.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(j) “Federal act” means the Comprehensive Environmental Response,
Compensation, and Liability Act of 1980, as amended through January 1, 2003.
(l) “Hazardous substance” means any substance:
(1) Defined as a hazardous substance under § 101(14) of the federal act; or
(2) Identified as a controlled hazardous substance by the Department in
the Code of Maryland Regulations.
9–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Discharge” means:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 474
(1) The addition, introduction, leaking, spilling, or emitting of a pollutant
into the waters of this State; or
(2) The placing of a pollutant in a location where the pollutant is likely to
pollute.
(e) “Industrial user” means:
(1) A person who is engaged in manufacturing, fabricating, or assembling
goods; or
(2) A member of any class of significant producers of pollutants identified
under rules or regulations adopted by:
(i) The Secretary; or
(ii) The administrator of the United States Environmental
Protection Agency.
(g) “Pollutant” means:
(1) Any waste or wastewater that is discharged from:
(i) A publicly owned treatment works; or
(ii) An industrial source; or
(2) Any other liquid, gaseous, solid, or other substance that will pollute any
waters of this State.
9–301.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(f) “Reclaimed water” means sewage that:
(1) Has been treated to a high quality suitable for various reuses; and
(2) Has a concentration of less than:
(i) 3 fecal coliform colonies per 100 milliliters;
(ii) 10 milligrams per liter of 5–day biological oxygen demand; and
(iii) 10 milligrams per liter of total suspended solids.
– 3 –

Ch. 474 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(h) (1) “Sewerage system” means:
(i) The channels used or intended to be used to collect and dispose
of sewage; and
(ii) Any structure and appurtenance used or intended to be used to
collect or prepare sewage for discharge into the waters of this State.
(2) “Sewerage system” includes any sewer of any size.
(3) “Sewerage system” does not include the plumbing system inside any
building served by the sewerage system.
9–303.4.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “AQUIFER” MEANS A GEOLOGIC FORMATION, GROUP OF
FORMATIONS, OR PART OF A FORMATION THAT IS CAPABLE OF YIELDING A
SIGNIFICANT AMOUNT OF WATER TO A WELL OR SPRING.
(3) “CONFINED AQUIFER” MEANS AN AQUIFER UNDER PRESSURE
FROM A RELATIVELY IMPERVIOUS LAYER OF MATERIAL LAYING ABOVE THE
AQUIFER.
(2) (4) “DEMONSTRATION FACILITY” MEANS AN ADVANCED WATER
TREATMENT FACILITY APPROVED UNDER A MANAGED AQUIFER RECHARGE PERMIT
TO TREAT RECLAIMED WATER FOR USE AS A SOURCE FOR TESTING GROUNDWATER
AUGMENTATION.
(5) “GROUNDWATER AUGMENTATION” MEANS THE INJECTION OF
RECLAIMED WATER INTO AN AQUIFER FOR ANY PURPOSE THAT IS NOT DISCHARGE.
(6) “HAZARDOUS SUBSTANCE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 7–201
OF THIS ARTICLE.
(3) (7) “MANAGED AQUIFER RECHARGE PERMIT” MEANS A PERMIT
ISSUED BY THE DEPARTMENT TO AUTHORIZE AND REGULATE THE TREATMENT AND
UNDERGROUND INJECTION OF TREATED RECLAIMED WATER FOR THE PURPOSE OF
TESTING THE FEASIBILITY OF AND REQUIREMENTS FOR SAFELY CONDUCTING FOR
GROUNDWATER AUGMENTATION.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 474
(4) “PFAS CHEMICALS” MEANS PER– AND POLYFLUOROALKYL
SUBSTANCES.
(5) (8) “PILOT PROGRAM” MEANS THE MANAGED AQUIFER
RECHARGE PILOT PROGRAM.
(B) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION, A PERSON MAY NOT
PERFORM GROUNDWATER AUGMENTATION.
(C) THERE IS A MANAGED AQUIFER RECHARGE PILOT PROGRAM IN THE
DEPARTMENT.
(C) (D) (1) THE PURPOSE OF THE PILOT PROGRAM IS TO AUTHORIZE,
THE TESTING OF THE REGULATED REGULATE, AND EVALUATE THE USE OF TREATED
RECLAIMED WATER AS A SOURCE FOR GROUNDWATER AUGMENTATION THROUGH
THE ISSUANCE OF MANAGED AQUIFER RECHARGE PERMITS.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT MAY NOT ISSUE MORE THAN ONE MANAGED
AQUIFER RECHARGE PERMIT UNDER THE PILOT PROGRAM.
(D) (E) (1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY REVIEW, PERMIT, AND REGULATE A
PROCESS TO TEST THE USE OF TREATED RECLAIMED WATER FROM A
DEMONSTRATION FACILITY AS A SOURCE FOR GROUNDWATER AUGMENTATION
THROUGH A MANAGED AQUIFER RECHARGE PERMIT IF THE DEPARTMENT
DETERMINES THAT:
(I) (1) THE DEMONSTRATION FACILITY GROUNDWATER
AUGMENTATION WILL ADDRESS A GROUNDWATER SUPPLY OR QUALITY PROBLEM
THAT IS OCCURRING OR REASONABLY ANTICIPATED TO OCCUR IN THE NEXT 25
YEARS, INCLUDING LAND SUBSIDENCE OR SALTWATER INTRUSION;
(II) (2) THE PROPOSED LOCATION OF THE DEMONSTRATION
FACILITY IS SUITABLE TO INFORM THE EVENTUAL LOCATION OF A FULL–SCALE OR
FOR LONG–TERM IMPLEMENTATION SITE OF GROUNDWATER AUGMENTATION;
(III) (3) THE RECLAIMED WATER WILL BE TREATED AT A THE
DEMONSTRATION FACILITY TO MEET OR SURPASS THE FOLLOWING REQUIREMENTS:
1. (I) PRIMARY AND SECONDARY MAXIMUM CONTAINMENT
CONTAMINANT LEVELS ESTABLISHED BY:
A. THE U.S. ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY
UNDER 40 C.F.R. §§ 141 AND 143; AND
– 5 –

Ch. 474 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
B. THE DEPARTMENT UNDER COMAR 26.04.01 THE
U.S. ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY OR THE DEPARTMENT;
(II) AT LEAST THREE SEPARATE TREATMENT PROCESSES THAT
INCLUDE:
1. OXIDATION TREATMENT;
2. TREATMENT FOR REMOVAL OF PATHOGENS AT THE
WASTEWATER TREATMENT STAGE AND ADVANCED WATER TREATMENT STAGE THAT,
IN TOTAL, MEETS OR EXCEEDS:
A. 12 LOG FOR ENTERIC VIRUS REDUCTION;
B. 10 LOG FOR GIARDIA CYST REDUCTION; AND
C. 10 LOG CRYPTOSPORIDIUM OOCYST REDUCTION; AND
3. FOR GROUNDWATER AUGMENTATION IN A CONFINED
AQUIFER:
A. REVERSE OSMOSIS; AND
B. TREATMENT TO ENSURE THAT TOTAL ORGANIC
CARBON DOES NOT EXCEED 0.5 MILLIGRAMS PER LITER BASED ON A 20–WEEK
RUNNING AVERAGE OF ALL TOTAL ORGANIC CARBON RESULTS AND THE AVERAGE
OF THE FOUR MOST RECENT TOTAL ORGANIC CARBON TEST RESULTS; AND
(III) MAXIMUM CONCENTRATIONS OF PFAS CHEMICALS
ESTABLISHED BY THE DEPARTMENT AND SPECIFIED IN ANY PRIMARY DRINKING
WATER REGULATIONS ESTABLISHED BY THE U.S. ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION
AGENCY IN A FINAL RULEMAKING UNDER THE FEDERAL SAFE DRINKING WATER
ACT TREATMENT FOR REMOVAL OF ANY HAZARDOUS SUBSTANCE IN THE
RECLAIMED WATER THAT DOES NOT HAVE A MAXIMUM CONTAMINANT LEVEL OR
EFFLUENT LIMIT ESTABLISHED BY THE U.S. ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION
AGENCY OR THE DEPARTMENT TO A QUANTITATIVE LEVEL THAT IS BASED ON
PUBLIC HEALTH CRITERIA;
(IV) (4) THE TREATED RECLAIMED WATER WILL UNDERGO
TESTING AND REPORTING TO VERIFY THAT THE REQUIREMENTS OF ITEM (III) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH SUBSECTION ARE MET;
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 474
(V) (5) THE APPLICANT HAS CONDUCTED AN ANALYSIS TO
EVALUATE ALTERNATIVES TO AQUIFER RECHARGE GROUNDWATER
AUGMENTATION;
(VI) (6) THE APPLICANT HAS IN PLACE A DETAILED TESTING
AND MONITORING PLAN TO DEMONSTRATE FACILITY PERFORMANCE AND
GROUNDWATER COMPATIBILITY DURING UNDERGROUND INJECTION
GROUNDWATER AUGMENTATION, INCLUDING ESTABLISHING PARAMETERS FOR
AUTHORIZING UNDERGROUND INJECTIONS AND REQUIRING ALTERNATIVE
METHODS OF USE OR DISPOSAL DISCHARGE WHEN THE INJECTION PARAMETERS
ARE NOT MET;
(VII) (7) THE APPLICANT HAS IDENTIFIED ALL WELLS THAT
WITHDRAW WATER FROM WITHIN 2 YEARS OF TRAVEL TIME FOR THE WATER FROM
THE LOCATION WHERE GROUNDWATER AUGMENTATION IS PROPOSED AND HAS
EVALUATED THE POTENTIAL IMPACT TO THOSE WELLS;
(8) THE APPLICANT HAS IDENTIFIED ALL INDUSTRIAL USERS THAT
DISCHARGE TO THE SEWERAGE SYSTEM FROM WHICH THE RECLAIMED WATER IS
RECEIVED AND THE POLLUTANTS IN EACH INDUSTRIAL USERS’ DISCHARGE;
(9) THE APPLICANT HAS PERFORMED A HYDROGEOLOGICAL
INVESTIGATION THAT INCLUDES:
(I) A DESCRIPTION OF THE GEOLOGIC AND
HYDROGEOLOGICAL SETTING OF THE PORTION OF THE AQUIFER THAT MAY BE
AFFECTED BY GROUNDWATER AUGMENTATION;
(II) A DETAILED DESCRIPTION OF THE STRATIGRAPHY
BENEATH THE PROJECT;
(III) A MAP OF THE EXISTING HYDROGEOLOGY AND THE
HYDROGEOLOGY ANTICIPATED AS A RESULT OF THE GROUNDWATER
AUGMENTATION BASED ON AT LEAST FOUR ROUNDS OF CONSECUTIVE QUARTERLY
MONITORING;
(IV) A MAP SHOWING QUARTERLY GROUNDWATER ELEVATION
CONTOURS, VECTOR FLOW DIRECTIONS, AND CALCULATED HYDRAULIC GRADIENTS
USE AT LEAST FOUR ROUNDS OF CONSECUTIVE QUARTERLY MONITORING;
(V) A MAP SHOWING THE LOCATION AND BOUNDARIES OF THE
PROJECT AND THE ZONE OF POTENTIAL DRINKING WATER WELL CONSTRUCTION;
AND
– 7 –

Ch. 474 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(VI) A SUMMARY OF THE RESULTS FROM AT LEAST FOUR
GROUNDWATER SAMPLES WITH AT LEAST ONE SAMPLE COLLECTED DURING EACH
QUARTER FROM EACH POTENTIALLY AFFECTED AQUIFER THAT INCLUDES TOTAL
NITROGEN, TOTAL ORGANIC CARBON, AND AN ANALYSIS OF ANY OTHER
CONSTITUENT REQUESTED BY THE DEPARTMENT;
(10) THE APPLICANT HAS SUBMITTED A MITIGATION PLAN TO
ADDRESS ENVIRONMENTAL AND SAFE DRINKING WATER RISKS THAT INCLUDES A
PLAN TO PROVIDE AN ALTERNATIVE DRINKING WATER SOURCE TO WELL USERS WHO
MAY BE AFFECTED BY THE GROUNDWATER AUGMENTATION ON A TEMPORARY OR
PERMANENT BASIS;
(11) THE APPLICANT IDENTIFIES THE LOCATIONS WHERE AT LEAST
TWO MONITORING WELLS WILL BE INSTALLED THAT ARE NOT LESS THAN 14 DAYS
AND NOT MORE THAN 180 DAYS OF TRAVEL TIME DOWNGRADIENT FROM THE
INJECTION WELL AND AT LEAST 30 DAYS OF TRAVEL TIME UPGRADIENT FROM THE
NEARING DRINKING WATER WELL;
(12) THE APPLICANT SUBMITS A DETAILED OPERATION AND
MAINTENANCE PLAN TO THE DEPARTMENT;
(VIII) (13) THE APPLICANT GIVES THE DEPARTMENT THE RIGHT
OF ENTRY ON THE PERMIT SITE AT ANY REASONABLE TIME TO INSPECT OR
INVESTIGATE FOR A VIOLATION OR ANY POTENTIAL VIOLATION OF THE MANAGED
AQUIFER RECHARGE PERMIT;
(IX) (14) THE PROCESS INCLUDES APPROPRIATE
RECORD–KEEPING REQUIREMENTS; AND
(X) (15) THE PROCESS COMPLIES WITH ALL OTHER
APPLICABLE STATUTORY AND REGULATORY REQUIREMENTS.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT MAY APPROVE THE USE BY A DEMONSTRATION
FACILITY OF ANY DRINKING WATER TREATMENT TECHNOLOGIES THAT HAVE THE
CAPABILITY TO MEET THE REQUIREMENTS OF PARAGRAPH (1)(III) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, INCLUDING NONMEMBRANE TREATMENT SYSTEMS.
(E) (F) (1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY INCLUDE IN A MANAGED AQUIFER
RECHARGE PERMIT ANY TERM, CONDITION, OR REQUIREMENT THAT THE
DEPARTMENT CONSIDERS APPROPRIATE TO PROTECT PUBLIC HEALTH OR THE
ENVIRONMENT.
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 474
(2) THE REQUIREMENTS OF A MANAGED AQUIFER RECHARGE PERMIT
ARE SUPPLEMENTAL TO AND DO NOT OVERRIDE ANY OTHER LAW, REGULATION,
PERMIT, ORDER, OR DECREE.
(3) THE PROVISIONS OF TITLE 1, SUBTITLE 6 OF THIS ARTICLE
SHALL GOVERN THE ISSUANCE OF MANAGED AQUIFER RECHARGE PERMITS.
(4) IN ADDITION TO THE NOTICE REQUIRED IN TITLE 1, SUBTITLE 6
OF THIS ARTICLE, AN APPLICANT SHALL SEND WRITTEN NOTICE OF THE
APPLICATION FOR A MANAGED AQUIFER RECHARGE PERMIT TO EACH OWNER OF A
PROPERTY CONTAINING A WELL IDENTIFIED IN SUBSECTION (E)(7) OF THIS
SECTION.
(5) A MANAGED AQUIFER RECHARGE PERMIT SHALL INCLUDE A
REQUIREMENT TO:
(I) INITIATE A TRACER STUDY WITHIN 3 MONTHS AFTER THE
DATE ON WHICH INJECTIONS BEGIN IN ORDER TO VERIFY THE RECLAIMED WATER’S
RETENTION TIME IN THE AQUIFER UNDER HYDRAULIC CONDITIONS THAT ARE
REPRESENTATIVE OF NORMAL OPERATIONS AT THE DEMONSTRATION FACILITY;
AND
(II) SUBMIT THE RESULTS OF THE TRACER STUDY TO THE
DEPARTMENT AS SOON AS PRACTICABLE AFTER THE COMPLETION OF THE TRACER
STUDY.
(G) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ACCEPT APPLICATIONS FOR MANAGED
AQUIFER RECHARGE PERMITS FROM JANUARY 2, 2026, TO JANUARY 3, 2028, BOTH
INCLUSIVE.
(F) (H) A SUCCESSFUL APPLICATION FOR A MANAGED AQUIFER
RECHARGE PERMIT SHALL:
(1) DEMONSTRATE TO THE SATISFACTION OF THE DEPARTMENT:
(I) THE ABILITY TO COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF
THIS SECTION;
(II) THE APPLICANT’S AVAILABLE FUNDING FOR THE
CONSTRUCTION AND OPERATION OF THE DEMONSTRATION FACILITY AND
IMPLEMENTATION OF ANY CONTINGENCY OR EMERGENCY PLAN;
(III) THE TECHNICAL AND ADMINISTRATIVE CAPACITY TO
PERFORM THE PROCESS COVERED UNDER COMPLY WITH THE PERMIT; AND
– 9 –

Ch. 474 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(IV) THAT ALL NECESSARY PLANNING AND ENGINEERING
DESIGN IS COMPLETE; AND
(2) INCLUDE ANY ADDITIONAL INFORMATION REQUESTED BY THE
DEPARTMENT.
(G) (I) THE DEPARTMENT MAY REFUSE TO ISSUE A MANAGED AQUIFER
RECHARGE PERMIT IF:
(1) THE APPLICANT FAILS TO PROVIDE ANY INFORMATION
REQUESTED BY THE DEPARTMENT;
(2) THE APPLICANT FAILS OR REFUSES TO ALLOW THE DEPARTMENT
TO INSPECT THE PERMIT SITE;
(3) THE DEPARTMENT FINDS THAT ISSUANCE OF THE PERMIT WOULD
VIOLATE ANY STATE OR FEDERAL LAW OR ANY REGULATION ADOPTED UNDER ANY
STATE OR FEDERAL LAW;
(4) THE SOURCE OF THE RECLAIMED WATER FAILS TO COMPLY WITH
ANY STATE OR FEDERAL LAW, ANY REGULATION ADOPTED UNDER ANY STATE OR
FEDERAL LAW, OR ANY PERMIT; OR
(5) THE APPLICANT FAILS TO DEMONSTRATE COMPLIANCE WITH
THIS SECTION TO THE DEPARTMENT’S SATISFACTION; OR
(6) THE DEPARTMENT FINDS THAT THE PROPOSED GROUNDWATER
AUGMENTATION MAY CREATE AN UNREASONABLE RISK TO PUBLIC HEALTH, SAFETY,
OR THE ENVIRONMENT.
(H) (J) (1) A MANAGED AQUIFER RECHARGE PERMIT ISSUED UNDER
THE PILOT PROGRAM SHALL BE EFFECTIVE FOR 10 5 YEARS FROM THE DATE OF
ISSUANCE.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT MAY RENEW A MANAGED AQUIFER RECHARGE
PERMIT FOR AN ADDITIONAL PERIOD OR PERIODS OF 5 YEARS FOLLOWING
ADMINISTRATIVE REVIEW BY THE DEPARTMENT AND SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS
OF TITLE 1, SUBTITLE 6 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(I) (K) THE DEPARTMENT MAY REVOKE A MANAGED AQUIFER
RECHARGE PERMIT ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION IF THE DEPARTMENT FINDS THAT:
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 474
(1) THE APPLICATION INCLUDED FALSE OR INACCURATE
INFORMATION;
(2) CONDITIONS OR REQUIREMENTS OF THE PERMIT HAVE BEEN OR
ARE ABOUT TO BE VIOLATED;
(3) SUBSTANTIAL DEVIATION FROM PLANS, SPECIFICATIONS, OR
REQUIREMENTS HAS OCCURRED OR IS ABOUT TO OCCUR;
(4) THE DEPARTMENT IS REFUSED ENTRY TO ANY PREMISES FOR
THE PURPOSE OF INSPECTING THE PROCESS INSPECTION TO ENSURE COMPLIANCE
WITH THE PERMIT;
(5) A CHANGE IN CONDITIONS EXISTS THAT REQUIRES THE
PERMANENT REDUCTION OR ELIMINATION OF THE USE OF TREATED RECLAIMED
WATER FOR GROUNDWATER AUGMENTATION;
(6) THERE IS ANY NONCOMPLIANCE WITH A DISCHARGE PERMIT,
PRETREATMENT STANDARD, OR A PRETREATMENT REQUIREMENT THAT MAY
AFFECT THE RECLAIMED WATER IN ANY MANNER;
(7) ANY STATE OR FEDERAL WATER QUALITY STANDARD OR
EFFLUENT LIMITATION HAS BEEN OR IS THREATENED TO BE VIOLATED;
(8) ANY STATE OR FEDERAL REQUIREMENT ESTABLISHED UNDER
THE FEDERAL SAFE DRINKING WATER ACT, THIS SUBTITLE, SUBTITLE 4 OF THIS
TITLE, OR TITLE 12 OF THIS ARTICLE HAS BEEN OR IS THREATENED TO BE
VIOLATED; OR
(9) THE TREATED RECLAIMED WATER MAY THREATEN PUBLIC
HEALTH, SAFETY, COMFORT, OR THE ENVIRONMENT.
(J) (L) (1) ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 1 EACH YEAR, EACH HOLDER
OF A MANAGED AQUIFER RECHARGE PERMIT SHALL REPORT TO THE DEPARTMENT
ON:
(I) THE APPLIED SCIENTIFIC RESULTS OF ANY
DEMONSTRATION FACILITY OR GROUNDWATER AUGMENTATION ACTIVITIES
UNDERTAKEN UNDER THE PILOT PROGRAM; AND
(II) ANY RECOMMENDATIONS FOR THE PILOT PROGRAM BASED
ON THE HOLDER’S EXPERIENCE IN THE PILOT PROGRAM.
– 11 –

Ch. 474 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31 EACH YEAR, 2028, AND EACH
DECEMBER 31 THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR
AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, THE
GENERAL ASSEMBLY ON:
(I) THE STATUS OF THE PILOT PROGRAM;
(II) ANY SCIENTIFIC RESULTS AND RECOMMENDATIONS
REPORTED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION;
(III) WHETHER THE PILOT PROGRAM SHOULD BE MODIFIED,
EXTENDED, OR MADE PERMANENT; AND
(IV) ANY STATUTORY OR REGULATORY CHANGES THAT THE
DEPARTMENT RECOMMENDS TO PERMANENTLY AUTHORIZE THE REGULATED USE
OF TREATED RECLAIMED WATER AS A SOURCE FOR GROUNDWATER AUGMENTATION,
IF APPROPRIATE.
(K) (M) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT
THIS SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 11 years and, at the end of
September 30, 2036, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly,
shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 12 –